Hawaii statutes.
§605-16 Judicial powers not affected.
Nothing in sections 605-14 to 605-17 shall diminish, alter, or affect the
inherent or statutory power of the supreme court or of any court to institute
and hear proceedings against any person for contempt or for violation of rules
or orders of court, or affect any rules of any court already in force. [L 1955,
c 150, §4; RL 1955, §217-17; HRS §605-16; am L 1979, c 105, §59]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next